Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6070.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "anti-offshoring accountability act". Sec. 3. As used in this act: (a) "Call center" means a centralized office used primarily for receiving or transmitting customer requests or inquiries by telephone. (b) "Department" means the department of labor and economic opportunity. (c) "Employer" means a person that meets both of the following conditions: (i) Employs, either full-time or part-time, 50 or more individuals at a call center. (ii) Receives any of the following from this state in accordance with a written agreement that is entered into on or after the effective date of this act: (A) A grant. (B) A loan. (C) A tax incentive. (d) "Person" means an individual or a sole proprietorship, partnership, association, corporation, or any other legal entity. Sec. 5. (1) An employer shall notify the department not less than 30 days before the employer does either of the following: (a) Relocates either of the following from this state to a foreign country: (i) A call center. (ii) A facility or operating unit within a call center comprising at least 30% of the call center's total call volume as measured against the call center's average call volume during the immediately preceding 12-month period. (b) Closes or otherwise ceases the operations of a call center or a facility or operating unit described in subdivision (a)(ii) if the employer contracts with or intends to contract with a person to provide the same services in a foreign country that the call center, facility, or operating unit provided. (2) An employer that violates subsection (1) must repay to the state any loan, grant, or tax incentive that the employer received from this state if the written agreement for the loan, grant, or tax incentive includes a provision that requires repayment for a violation of subsection (1). The prosecutor of the county in which the violation occurred or the attorney general may bring an action to collect the repayment. Sec. 7. (1) Beginning 6 months after the effective date of this act, and every 6 months thereafter, the department shall compile a registry of the employers required to provide notice under section 5(1). The registry must include all of the following information: (a) The name of the employer. (b) The date of the relocation or closing, as applicable. (c) The number of jobs to be relocated or eliminated, as applicable. (d) The location of the relocated or new call center, facility, or operating unit, including the name of the city and the country. (2) Only authorized state agencies, as determined by the department, may access the registry for the purpose of determining if an employer is eligible for a grant, loan, or tax incentive. (3) An employer shall remain on the registry for not less than 5 years or until the employer repays in full any grant, loan, or tax incentive under section 5, whichever occurs first. Enacting section 1. This act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law.